Tennessee, session 114, HB0882.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 5, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the department of environment and
conservation shall not regulate or otherwise oversee farming activities involving topsoil,
rock removal, or the building of a pond when such activities are conducted in an area
that is less than three (3) acres in size, and the property on which the activities occur
has a greenbelt classification pursuant to the Agricultural, Forest and Open Space Land
Act of 1976, compiled in title 67, chapter 5, part 10.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0882
001450
- 1 -